District of Columbia statutes.
42-505

Estates pur autre vie; when deemed freehold and when chattel real.

An estate for the life of a third person, whether limited to heirs or otherwise, shall be deemed a freehold only during the life of the grantee or devisee, but after his death it shall be deemed a chattel real and be a part of his personal estate.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1351, ch. 854, § 1015
1981 Ed., § 45-205.
1973 Ed., § 45-805.